Tennessee, session 114, HB0180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-51-201(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) Owners of real property used primarily for agricultural purposes who reside in
a territory previously annexed by ordinance that was not annexed through a referendum
or a request of the property owner may petition the municipality to deannex such
property, if:
(A) The deannexation of the property does not create an area of
unincorporated territory that is completely surrounded by municipal boundaries,
except for such real property that is under a permanent conservation easement;
and
(B) The owner of some or all of the property at the time the petition is
made is:
(i) The same owner or owners as when the property was
annexed;
(ii) A direct descendant of the person who owned the property at
the time of annexation. As used in this subdivision (c)(1)(B)(ii), "direct
descendant" means a child, grandchild, or sibling; or
(iii) A business in which the majority ownership is held by
individuals who qualify under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) or (c)(1)(B)(ii).
HB0180
001704
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001704